Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2000.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania and National Medal of Honor Highway Act.Section 2. Designation of Pennsylvania and National Medal of Honor Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Medal of Honor is our nation's highest award for valor presented to veterans of the armed forces of the United States for acting with conspicuous gallantry and intrepidity above and beyond the call of duty at the risk of one's life during combat with an enemy of the United States.12345678910111213141516 (2) The Medal of Honor is widely respected by the military and public alike.(3) Three hundred twenty-one Medal of Honor recipients were born in Pennsylvania, 382 recipients entered service from Pennsylvania and 241 recipients were laid to rest in Pennsylvania.(4) Pennsylvania's Medal of Honor recipients served during 14 wars, from the Civil War to the Iraq War, over a period of more than 145 years.(5) The nonprofit Bend Heroes Foundation and the Oregon Legislature created a law designating all 451 miles of the border-to-border US Route 20 in Oregon as the Oregon Medal of Honor Highway, a first in our nation to honor all of a state's Medal of Honor recipients.(6) The Oregon law proposes a national Medal of Honor Highway to be created on US Route 20 at 3,365 miles in length.(7) Legislatures and governors in all 12 states along US Route 20 have designated their state Medal of Honor Highways covering 100% of the 3,365-mile Medal of Honor Highway across America.(8) On December 17, 2024, US Route 20 was designated as the National Medal of Honor Highway. By designating US Route 20 as the Pennsylvania and National Medal of Honor Highway, we honor the service and sacrifice of Medal of Honor recipients across the United States and in this Commonwealth.(9) Pennsylvania has the second-highest number of Medal of Honor recipients of any state.(10) A 45-mile, border-to-border Pennsylvania and National Medal of Honor Highway designated on US Route 20 20250HB2000PN2540 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 would honor our Commonwealth's and our nation's current and future Medal of Honor recipients and advance a 3,365-mile National Medal of Honor Highway across America between the Pacific and Atlantic Oceans.(11) Pennsylvania deeply appreciates the service and sacrifice of its Medal of Honor recipients and the positive roles they played in their communities for more than 145 years.(b) Designation.--The entire portion, 45.433 miles, of US Route 20 in Pennsylvania, beginning at the Pennsylvania-Ohio State Line and ending at the Pennsylvania-New York State Line, is designated as the Pennsylvania and National Medal of Honor Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs, brown with white trim and lettering, displaying the name of the highway to traffic in each direction of the route in each House legislative district the route passes through and near the borders of Ohio and New York. The sign shall also display the Army Medal of Honor, Navy Medal of Honor and Air Force Medal of Honor.Section 3. Repeals.Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate this act.(2) Section 16 of the act of June 30, 2021 (P.L.339, No.64), entitled "An act designating the bridges, identified as Bridge Key 31419 and Bridge Key 31420, on that portion of U.S. Route 219 over State Route 601 in Conemaugh Township, Somerset County, as the Corporal Anthony G. Orlandi Memorial Bridge; designating the interchange of State Route 43, also 20250HB2000PN2540 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Mon-Fayette Expressway, with U.S. Route 40, known as Exit 22, in Redstone Township, Fayette County, as the PFC Joseph Frank Duda Memorial Interchange KIA WWII U.S.M.C.; designating the interchange of U.S. Route 40 with State Route 4035, also known as Market Street and Spring Street, in Brownsville, Fayette County, as the Corporal Denny Ray Easter Memorial Interchange KIA Vietnam War U.S. Army; designating the portion of Pennsylvania Route 837, also known as Duquesne Boulevard, between Center Street in the City of Duquesne, Allegheny County, and Hoffman Boulevard in West Mifflin Borough, Allegheny County, as the Clifton P. Pitts Memorial Highway; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8391, on that portion of Pennsylvania Route 53 over Laurel Run, also known as Lost Creek, in Dean Township, Cambria County, as the Seaman 2nd Class Louis J. Benzie WWII Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8461, on that portion of U.S. Route 219 over Pennsylvania Route 53, also known as Railroad Street, in Croyle Township, Cambria County, as the Janice Keen-Livingston First Responders' Memorial Bridge; designating the portion of State Route 4014, also known as Grandview Boulevard, from Pittsburgh Avenue to State Route 4015, also known as Zuck Road, in Millcreek Township, Erie County, as the John A. Pulice Memorial Highway; designating a bridge on that portion of State Route 4001 over Crooked Creek, Armstrong Township, Indiana County, as the Sergeant Carl Roof Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 25488, carrying State Route 1011 over Mix Creek, Eldred Township, McKean County, as the Sgt. Neil K. Dorrion Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 39504, 20250HB2000PN2540 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 carrying Pennsylvania Route 3004 over the Allegheny River, Roulette Township, Potter County, as the SSG Gerrith Kibbe Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 32773, on that portion of U.S. Route 6 over the Tioga River, Mansfield Borough, Tioga County, as the Mansfield Veterans Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 5840, on that portion of SR 4010 (17th Street) over Interstate 99 in Logan Township, Blair County, as the Honorable Richard A. Geist Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 45998, carrying State Route 2027 in North Union Township, Fayette County, as the SSG Willis J. Crayton Memorial Bridge; designating the bridge, identified as Bridge Key 4133, carrying Pennsylvania Route 913 over Raystown Branch Juniata River in Liberty Township, Bedford County, as the Sergeant Charles Warsing Memorial Bridge; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 68033, carrying State Route 2047 over CSX and SEPTA Railroads, in Middletown Township, Bucks County, as the PFC John Elton Candy Memorial Bridge; designating the entire portion of US Route 20 in Pennsylvania, beginning at the Pennsylvania-Ohio State Line and ending at the Pennsylvania-New York State Line, as the Pennsylvania Medal of Honor Highway; designating the portion of State Route 2038, also known as Fitzwatertown Road, between Jenkintown Road and North Hills Avenue in Upper Dublin Township, Montgomery County, as the CPL Vincent J. Wargo, Jr., U.S.M.C. Memorial Highway; designating a bridge, identified as Bridge Key 43267, on that portion of State Route 3041, also known as Dishong Mountain Road, over U.S. Route 22 in Jackson Township, Cambria County, as the Technical Sergeant Mike Capelli Memorial Bridge; and making 20250HB2000PN2540 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related repeals," is repealed.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2000PN2540 - 6 - 123